District of Columbia statutes.
4-412

Compliance with District regulation.

(a)

Any child development center or child development home that contracts or agrees with the Department to provide day care shall comply with all applicable provisions of Regulation No. 74-34 (Child Development Facilities Regulation).

(b)

Licenses issued to child development facilities or child development homes under this section or any other provision of law shall be issued as a Public Health: Child Health and Welfare endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of Chapter 28 of Title 47.

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 13, 26 DCR 20
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(f), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(e), 50 DCR 6913
1981 Ed., § 3-312.
1973 Ed., § 3-312.
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “Public Health: Child Health and Welfare endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Public Health: Child Health and Welfare endorsement to a master business license under the master”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(e) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).